Utah statutes.
4-38-11.   Stimulation or retardation of animals prohibited -- Tests.

(1)  Any person who uses or permits the use of any mechanical or electrical device, or drug of any kind, to stimulate or retard any animal in any race authorized by this chapter, except as prescribed by the commission, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

(2)  A commission member or race steward may cause tests to be made that they consider proper to determine whether any animal has been stimulated or retarded.  Tests performed in furtherance of this section shall be conducted by or under the supervision of a licensed Utah veterinarian.



Enacted by Chapter 296, 1992 General Session

